es: Tipo de montaje de la bomba de agua: Atornillable (carcasa separada); Cartucho/inserto; Carcasa integrada (módulo); Otro
nl: Waterpomp montage type: Aangeschroefd (aparte behuizing); Cartridge/inzetstuk; Geïntegreerde behuizing (module); Overige
vi: Loại lắp đặt bơm nước: Gắn bằng bu-lông (vỏ rời); Lõi/ống lắp trong; Vỏ tích hợp (mô-đun); Khác
ko: 워터 펌프 장착 유형: 볼트 체결형(분리형 하우징); 카트리지/인서트; 통합형 하우징(모듈); 기타
sv: Monteringstyp för vattenpump: Fastskruvad (separat hölje); Patron/insats; Integrerat hölje (modul); Övrigt
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης αντλίας νερού: Βιδωτό (ξεχωριστό περίβλημα); Φύσιγγα/ένθετο; Ενσωματωμένο περίβλημα (μονάδα); Άλλο
en: Water pump mounting type: Bolt-on (separate housing); Cartridge/insert; Integrated housing (module); Other
ru: Тип крепления водяного насоса: На болтах (отдельный корпус); Картридж/вкладыш; Встроенный корпус (модуль); Другое
da: Monteringstype for vandpumpe: Påskruet (separat hus); Patron/indsats; Integreret hus (modul); Andet
ro-RO: Tipul de montare a pompei de apă: Fixare cu șuruburi (carcasă separată); Cartuș/inserție; Carcasă integrată (modul); Altele
lt-LT: Vandens siurblio tvirtinimo tipas: Prisukamas (atskiras korpusas); Kasetė / įdėklas; Integruotas korpusas (modulis); Kita
fi: Vesipumpun kiinnityksen tyyppi: Pultattava (erillinen kotelo); Patruuna/sisäosa; Integroitu kotelo (moduuli); Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da bomba de água: Aparafusado (compartimento separado); Cartucho/inserção; Compartimento integrado (módulo); Outro
zh-TW: 水泵安裝類型: 螺栓固定 (獨立外殼); 卡匣式/嵌入式; 整合式外殼 (模組); 其他
pt-BR: Bomba d’água tipo de montagem: Aparafusado (compartimento separado); Cartucho/encaixe; Compartimento integrado (módulo); Outros
nb: Monteringstype for vannpumpe: Skrudd på (separat hus); Patron/innsats; Integrert hus (modul); Annet
cs: Typ montáže vodního čerpadla: Na šrouby (samostatný kryt); Kazeta/vložka; Integrovaný kryt (modul); Jiný
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže vodene crpke: Vijčani (zasebno kućište); Uložak / umetak; Integrirano kućište (modul); Ostalo
tr: Su pompası montaj tipi: Cıvatalı (ayrı gövde); Kartuş/ek parça; Entegre gövde (modül); Diğer
fr: Type de montage de la pompe à eau: Boulonné (boîtier séparé); Cartouche/insert; Boîtier intégré (module); Autre
hu: Vízszivattyú-rögzítés típusa: Felcsavarozható (külön ház); Patron/betét; Integrált ház (modul); Egyéb
zh-CN: 水泵安装方式: 螺栓连接（独立外壳）; 筒式/插芯式; 集成外壳（模块）; 其他
pl: Typ montażu pompy wody: Przykręcana (oddzielna obudowa); Wkład; Zintegrowana obudowa (moduł); Inne
sk-SK: Typ montáže vodného čerpadla: Skrutkovacie (oddelené puzdro); Vložka/kazeta; Integrované puzdro (modul); Iné
de: Montageart der Wasserpumpe: Angeschraubt (separates Gehäuse); Kartusche/Einsatz; Integriertes Gehäuse (Modul); Sonstige
it: Tipo di montaggio della pompa dell'acqua: Imbullonato (alloggiamento separato); A cartuccia/inserto; Alloggiamento integrato (modulo); Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve vodne črpalke: Privijačeno (ločeno ohišje); Vložek/kartuša; Integrirano ohišje (modul); Drugo
ja: ウォーターポンプ取り付けタイプ: ボルトオン (独立ハウジング); カートリッジ/インサート; 統合ハウジング (モジュール); その他
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งปั๊มน้ำ: ขันน็อต (โครงแยก); ตลับ/ส่วนแทรก; โครงในตัว (โมดูล); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на водна помпа: С болтове (отделен корпус); Касета/вложка; Вграден корпус (модул); Други